New Jersey, session 221, S2665.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  There is established the New Jersey Alzheimer's Disease Master Plan Study Commission in the Department of Human Services. b.    The commission shall consist of 15 members as follows: (1)   the Commissioners of Health and Human Services, or their designees, who shall serve ex officio; (2)   two members of the Senate, to be appointed by the President of the Senate, who shall not be of the same political party; (3)   two members of the General Assembly, to be appointed by the Speaker of the General Assembly, who shall not be of the same political party; and (4)   nine members appointed by the Governor, as follows: two persons recommended by the Alzheimer's Association; three health care professionals who are currently involved in the provision of direct services, one of whom shall be a representative of an agency that provides home care services to persons with dementia, one of whom shall be a representative of an assisted living facility that provides specialized services to persons with dementia, and one of whom shall be a representative of a licensed nursing home that provides specialized services to persons with dementia; one representative from the clergy who has experience providing emotional and spiritual care and support for persons with Alzheimer's disease and their families; two persons, who by reason of family relationship or legal guardianship, bear or have borne responsibility in caring for a person with Alzheimer's disease; and one attorney who is currently licensed and practicing in New Jersey, has expertise in legal and financial planning and elder care issues, and has extensive community-based experience working with persons with Alzheimer's disease and their families. c.     Vacancies in the membership of the commission shall be filled in the same manner provided for the original appointments. d.    The commission shall organize as soon as practicable following the appointment of its members, and shall select a chairperson from among the members.  The chairperson shall appoint a secretary who need not be a member of the commission. e.     Members of the commission shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as members of the commission, within the limits of funds appropriated or otherwise made available to the commission for its purposes. f.     The commission shall be entitled to call to its assistance and avail itself of the services of the employees of any State, county, or municipal department, board, bureau, commission, or agency as it may require, and as may be available to it for its purposes. g.    The Department of Human Services shall provide staff support to the commission, as necessary. 2.    It shall be the duty of the New Jersey Alzheimer's Disease Master Plan Study Commission, established pursuant to section 1 of this section, to develop a master plan for the State to implement to address the impact of Alzheimers disease and other related dementias.  The master plan shall include measures to: a.     Prepare the State to address the needs of individuals diagnosed with Alzheimers disease and their caregivers. b.    Educate the public to increase awareness and understanding about Alzheimer's and other related dementias utilizing identified community resources, services, and efforts. c.     Improve the quality and effectiveness of the health care provided to individuals diagnosed with Alzheimers disease. d.    Ensure adequate and sustainable funding for individuals diagnosed with Alzheimers disease. e.     Enable individuals diagnosed with Alzheimers disease to live in the most integrated, community-based setting, in accordance with their needs and preferences. f.     Foster opportunities for individuals diagnosed with Alzheimers disease to be meaningfully engaged in their communities. g.    Support unpaid family caregivers who serve individuals diagnosed with Alzheimers disease. h.    Develop programs and policies for individuals diagnosed with Alzheimers disease that impact mental and physical health, safety, and well-being. i.     Develop programs and policies for individuals diagnosed with Alzheimers disease that enable individuals to receive services at home and in community-based settings as an alternative to institutionalization. j.     Develop programs and policies for individuals diagnosed with Alzheimers disease that lift these individuals out of poverty. k.    Establish benchmarks to assess and measure progress in accomplishing the master plan goals. l.     Develop affordable housing options for individuals diagnosed with Alzheimers disease m.   Prevent exploitation and abuse, including financial abuse and physical abuse, of individuals diagnosed with Alzheimers disease. 3.    The New Jersey Alzheimer's Disease Master Plan Study Commission, established pursuant to section 1 of this section, may meet and hold hearings at such places and times as it shall designate, and shall submit the Master Plan to the Governor, and to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), within two years of the appointment of a majority of the public members of the commission. 4.    This act shall take effect immediately.  The commission shall expire 60 days after the submission of the report required pursuant to section 3 of this act.